Indiana, session 2026, HB1330.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-10-1-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2023,
SECTION 58, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) The ballot for a primary election shall be
printed in substantially the form described in this section for all the
offices for which candidates have qualified under IC 3-8. Subsection
(g)(5)(A) shall be included on the ballot only if the county council
and county commissioners have not, by a unanimous vote,
eliminated the office of township assessor and consolidated the
office with the county assessor.
(b) The following shall be printed as the heading for the ballot for
a political party:
"OFFICIAL PRIMARY BALLOT
_________________ Party (insert the name of the political party)".
(c) The following shall be printed immediately below the heading
required by subsection (b) or be posted in each voting booth as
provided in IC 3-11-2-8(b):
(1) For paper ballots, print: To vote for a person, make a voting
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134


mark (X or (cid:85)) on or in the box before the person's name in the
proper column.
(2) For optical scan ballots, print: To vote for a person, darken or
shade in the circle, oval, or square (or draw a line to connect the
arrow) that precedes the person's name in the proper column.
(3) For optical scan ballots that do not contain a candidate's name,
print: To vote for a person, darken or shade in the oval that
precedes the number assigned to the person's name in the proper
column.
(4) For electronic voting systems, print: To vote for a person,
touch the screen (or press the button) in the location indicated.
(d) Local public questions shall be placed on the primary election
ballot after the heading and the voting instructions described in
subsection (c) (if the instructions are printed on the ballot) and before
the offices described in subsection (g).
(e) The local public questions described in subsection (d) shall be
placed as follows:
(1) In a separate column on the ballot if voting is by paper ballot.
(2) After the heading and the voting instructions described in
subsection (c) (if the instructions are printed on the ballot) and
before the offices described in subsection (g), in the form
specified in IC 3-11-13-11 if voting is by ballot card.
(3) As provided by either of the following if voting is by an
electronic voting system:
(A) On a separate screen for a public question.
(B) After the heading and the voting instructions described in
subsection (c) (if the instructions are printed on the ballot) and
before the offices described in subsection (g), in the form
specified in IC 3-11-14-3.5.
(f) A public question shall be placed on the primary election ballot
in the following form:
(The explanatory text for the public question,
if required by law.)
"Shall (insert public question)?"
[] YES
[] NO
(g) The offices with candidates for nomination shall be placed on
the primary election ballot in the following order:
(1) Federal and state offices:
(A) President of the United States.
(B) United States Senator.
(C) Governor.
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134


(D) United States Representative.
(2) Legislative offices:
(A) State senator.
(B) State representative.
(3) Circuit offices and county judicial offices:
(A) Judge of the circuit court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the circuit court.
(B) Judge of the superior court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the superior court.
(C) Judge of the probate court.
(D) Prosecuting attorney.
(E) Circuit court clerk.
(4) County offices:
(A) County auditor.
(B) County recorder.
(C) County treasurer.
(D) County sheriff.
(E) County coroner.
(F) County surveyor.
(G) County assessor.
(H) County commissioner.
(I) County council member.
(5) Township offices:
(A) Township assessor (only in a township referred to in
IC 36-6-5-1(d)).
(B) Township trustee.
(C) Township board member.
(D) Judge of the small claims court.
(E) Constable of the small claims court.
(6) City offices:
(A) Mayor.
(B) Clerk or clerk-treasurer.
(C) Judge of the city court.
(D) City-county council member or common council member.
(7) Town offices:
(A) Clerk-treasurer.
(B) Judge of the town court.
(C) Town council member.
(h) The political party offices with candidates for election shall be
placed on the primary election ballot in the following order after the
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134


offices described in subsection (g):
(1) Precinct committeeman.
(2) State convention delegate.
(i) The local offices to be elected at the primary election shall be
placed on the primary election ballot after the offices described in
subsection (h).
(j) The offices described in subsection (i) shall be placed as follows:
(1) In a separate column on the ballot if voting is by paper ballot.
(2) After the offices described in subsection (h) in the form
specified in IC 3-11-13-11 if voting is by ballot card.
(3) Either:
(A) on a separate screen for each office or public question; or
(B) after the offices described in subsection (h) in the form
specified in IC 3-11-14-3.5;
if voting is by an electronic voting system.
(k) If no candidate has filed to run for an office on the primary ballot
then the county election board may print "NO CANDIDATE FILED"
in the place on the ballot where a candidate's name would have been
printed.
SECTION 2. IC 3-10-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.278-2019,
SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. The following public officials shall be elected
at the general election before their terms of office expire and every four
(4) years thereafter:
(1) Clerk of the circuit court.
(2) County auditor.
(3) County recorder.
(4) County treasurer.
(5) County sheriff.
(6) County coroner.
(7) County surveyor.
(8) County assessor.
(9) County commissioner.
(10) County council member.
(11) Township trustee.
(12) Township board member.
(13) Township assessor (only in a township referred to in
IC 36-6-5-1(d)).
(14) Judge of a small claims court.
(15) Constable of a small claims court.
The public official described in subdivision (13) shall be elected
only if the county council and county commissioners have not, by
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134


a unanimous vote, eliminated the office of township assessor and
consolidated the office with the county assessor.
SECTION 3. IC 3-11-2-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the following
offices shall be placed on the general election ballot in the following
order after the public questions described in section 10(a) of this
chapter:
(1) Federal and state offices:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States.
(B) United States Senator.
(C) Governor and lieutenant governor.
(D) Secretary of state.
(E) State comptroller (auditor of state).
(F) Treasurer of state.
(G) Attorney general.
(H) United States Representative. If an election to fill a
vacancy in an office of United States Representative under
IC 3-10-8 is held on the same day as the election for the next
term of the same office, the ballot shall list the election to fill
the vacancy in the office immediately after the election for the
next term of the office.
(2) Legislative offices:
(A) State senator.
(B) State representative.
(3) Circuit offices and county judicial offices:
(A) Judge of the circuit court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the circuit court.
(B) Judge of the superior court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the superior court.
(C) Judge of the probate court.
(D) Prosecuting attorney.
(E) Clerk of the circuit court.
(4) County offices:
(A) County auditor.
(B) County recorder.
(C) County treasurer.
(D) County sheriff.
(E) County coroner.
(F) County surveyor.
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134


(G) County assessor.
(H) County commissioner.
(I) County council member.
(5) Township offices:
(A) Township assessor (only in a township referred to in
IC 36-6-5-1(d)).
(B) Township trustee.
(C) Township board member.
(D) Judge of the small claims court.
(E) Constable of the small claims court.
(6) City offices:
(A) Mayor.
(B) Clerk or clerk-treasurer.
(C) Judge of the city court.
(D) City-county council member or common council member.
(7) Town offices:
(A) Clerk-treasurer.
(B) Judge of the town court.
(C) Town council member.
(b) If a major political party does not nominate a candidate for an
office on a general, municipal, or special election ballot then the county
election board may print "NO CANDIDATE FILED" in the place on
the ballot where the name of the major political party's nominee would
be printed.
(c) The office described in subsection (a)(5)(A) shall be placed
on the general election ballot only if the county council and county
commissioners have not, by a unanimous vote, eliminated the office
of township assessor and consolidated the office with the county
assessor.
SECTION 4. IC 6-1.1-5-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2008,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. In a county containing a consolidated city, if
the county council and county commissioners have not, by a
unanimous vote, eliminated the office of township assessor:
(1) the township assessor has the duties and authority described
in sections 1 through 8 of this chapter; and
(2) the county assessor has the duties and authority described in
sections 1 through 8 of this chapter for a township for which there
is no township assessor.
These duties and authority include effecting the transfer of title to real
property and preparing, maintaining, approving, correcting, indexing,
and publishing the list or record of, or description of title to, real
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134


property. If a court renders a judgment for the partition or transfer of
real property located in a county containing a consolidated city, the
clerk of the court shall deliver the transcript to the county assessor.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-18.5-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2010,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. The department of local government finance
shall adjust the maximum permissible ad valorem tax levy of each
county and township to reflect any transfer of duties between assessors
under IC 36-2-15-5, or IC 36-6-5-2 (repealed), IC 36-6-5-5, or
IC 36-6-5-6.
SECTION 6. IC 36-6-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2008,
SECTION 711, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), the assessor shall perform the duties prescribed by
statute, including assessment duties prescribed by IC 6-1.1.
(b) Subsection (a) does not apply if the duties of the township
assessor have been transferred to the county assessor as described in
IC 6-1.1-1-24 or IC 36-2-15. if the county council and county
commissioners have, by a unanimous vote, eliminated the office of
township assessor and consolidated the office with the county
assessor.
SECTION 7. IC 36-6-5-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) The county council and county
commissioners in a county may eliminate the office of township
assessor in the county if each entity adopts an ordinance to do so
by unanimous vote. If the office of a township assessor is
eliminated as the result of the county council's and county
commissioners' unanimous vote eliminating the office of township
assessor, the following apply on the date the office is eliminated, as
provided in the ordinances adopted by the county council and
county commissioners:
(1) The office of township assessor for that township is
abolished on January 1 following the adoption of the
ordinances.
(2) The county assessor of the county in which the township is
located shall assume the duties of the township assessor on
January 1 following the adoption of the ordinances.
(3) All of the following are transferred to the county assessor
on January 1 following the adoption of the ordinances:
(A) All employment positions of all employees of the
township assessor.
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134


(B) The real and personal property of the township
assessor.
(C) The obligations outstanding on the date the office of
township assessor is eliminated.
(D) The funds of the township assessor.
(b) An employee of the office of the township assessor on the
date the office of the township assessor is eliminated is entitled to
remain in the employee's position transferred under subsection (a)
until the earlier of the following:
(1) The employee resigns from the position.
(2) The employee's employment is terminated. However, an
employee described in this subsection may be terminated only
in the same manner that other employees of the county
assessor may be terminated.
(c) The county auditor shall transfer to the county assessor all
revenue received by the township:
(1) through the date that the office of the township assessor is
eliminated; and
(2) for the purpose of carrying out property assessment
duties;
in the amount determined by the county auditor.
SECTION 8. IC 36-6-5-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Each county assessor and township assessor
whose duties will be transferred under this chapter shall:
(1) organize the records of the assessor's office relating to the
assessment of tangible property in a manner prescribed by the
department of local government finance; and
(2) transfer the records as directed by the department of local
government finance.
(b) The department of local government finance shall determine
a procedure and schedule for the transfer of the records and
operations. The assessors shall assist each other and coordinate
their efforts to:
(1) ensure an orderly transfer of all records; and
(2) provide for an uninterrupted and professional transition
of the functions of assessors consistent with this chapter,
IC 6-1.1, and the directions of the department of local
government finance.
SECTION 9. IC 36-7-11.2-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.219-2007,
SECTION 121, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. As used in this chapter, "notice"
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134


means written notice:
(1) served personally upon the person, official, or office entitled
to the notice; or
(2) served upon the person, official, or office by placing the notice
in the United States mail, first class postage prepaid, properly
addressed to the person, official, or office. Notice is considered
served if mailed in the manner prescribed by this subdivision
properly addressed to the following:
(A) The governor, both to the address of the governor's official
residence and to the governor's executive office in
Indianapolis.
(B) The Indiana department of transportation, to the
commissioner.
(C) The department of natural resources, both to the director
of the department and to the director of the department's
division of historic preservation and archeology.
(D) The department of metropolitan development.
(E) An occupant, to:
(i) the person by name; or
(ii) if the name is unknown, the "Occupant" at the address of
the Meridian Street or bordering property occupied by the
person.
(F) An owner, to the person by the name shown to be the name
of the owner, and at the person's address, as the address
appears in the records in the bound volumes of the most recent
real estate tax assessment records as the records appear in:
(i) the offices of the township assessors in a county where
the county council and county commissioners have not,
by a unanimous vote, eliminated the office of township
assessor; or
(ii) the office of the county assessor;
in Marion County.
(G) A neighborhood association or the society, to the
organization at the latest address as shown in the records of the
commission.
SECTION 10. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The legislative
services agency, under the supervision of the code revision
committee, shall prepare legislation for introduction during the
2027 session of the general assembly to amend Indiana law to make
necessary corrections and changes in the Indiana Code to reflect
the abolition of the office of township assessor.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2030.
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134


SECTION 11. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1330—LS 6818/DI 134